Tennessee, session 114, HB2511.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-5107(a), is amended by adding
the language "by an airport authority under title 42, chapter 3 or 4," immediately after the
language "by the housing development agency in title 13,".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2511
011261
- 1 -